New York, session 2025-2026, A5020.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 152-e to read as follows: 3 § 152-e. Co-navigation services program for persons who are deaf- 4 blind. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall have the 5 following meanings: 6 (a) "Communication mode" includes communication through: 7 (i) auditory amplification, such as through a personal hearing aid or 8 assistive listening device; 9 (ii) American Sign Language or Signed English by both tactile and 10 visual means; and 11 (iii) protactile language. 12 (b) "Co-navigation services" means services provided to a person who 13 is deaf-blind that assist the person to physically access the person's 14 environment and to make informed decisions. The term includes providing 15 visual and environmental information or sighted guide services and 16 assisting with communication accessibility by communicating in the 17 preferred language and communication mode of the person who is deaf- 18 blind. The term does not include performing any of the following for the 19 person: 20 (i) providing personal care services to the person; 21 (ii) completing ordinary errands for the person; 22 (iii) making decisions for the person; 23 (iv) teaching or otherwise instructing the person; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08090-01-5 A. 5020 2 1 (v) interpreting for the person in a formal setting, including a 2 medical, legal, or business setting. 3 (c) "Co-navigator" means a person who is specially trained to provide 4 co-navigation services. 5 (d) "Program" means the deaf-blind co-navigation services program. 6 (e) "Protactile language" means a method of communication based on 7 touch that is used by persons who are deaf-blind. 8 2. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a social 9 services district shall, in accordance with the provisions of this 10 section and regulations of the department, offer and provide a co-navi- 11 gation services program through which: 12 (a) co-navigation services are provided by co-navigators; and 13 (b) the social services district reimburses the co-navigators for the 14 provision of the services from funds appropriated therefor. 15 3. The commissioner shall establish reimbursement rates to be paid to 16 a co-navigator under the program. The reimbursement rates shall use a 17 tiered wage scale that is based on the co-navigator's: 18 (a) level of training in communication modes for persons who are deaf- 19 blind and in sighted guide-mobility techniques; and 20 (b) fluency and skill in communication modes and sighted guide-mobili- 21 ty for persons who are deaf-blind. 22 4. A social services district shall ensure that quality co-navigation 23 services are provided under the program by: 24 (a) monitoring the compliance of co-navigators with program rules; 25 (b) developing funding sources for the program that are in addition to 26 state sources and will reduce reliance on the state sources for contin- 27 uation of the program; and 28 (c) providing funding and technical assistance for training programs 29 for: 30 (i) co-navigators under the program; and 31 (ii) persons who are deaf-blind to enable those persons to effectively 32 use the services offered under the program. 33 5. The commissioner may establish an advisory committee to advise the 34 commission in developing and operating the program, including operating 35 the program in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state money. 36 The commissioner shall determine the number of members serving on the 37 advisory committee, which shall include persons who are deaf-blind and 38 other stakeholders. 39 6. The commissioner shall promulgate all rules and regulations neces- 40 sary to: 41 (a) operate the program in a manner that is efficient and maximizes 42 the number of persons served; and 43 (b) ensure that co-navigators receiving reimbursement under the 44 program have adequate training to provide co-navigation services. 45 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 46 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 47 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 48 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 49 completed on or before such effective date.